Utah statutes.
38-7-4.   Hospital lien docket provided by district court -- Contents.

Every district court shall, at the expense of the county, provide and maintain a suitable bound book to be called the hospital lien docket, and in which shall be entered any hospital lien claim filed. The district court shall enter the name of the injured person, the name of the person, firm, or corporation alleged to be liable for the injuries and damages, the date and place of the accident, and the name of the hospital or other institution making the claim. The district court shall also maintain a proper index of the hospital lien docket under the name of the injured person.

